Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.191, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Apportionment formula of general application. (a) Except for those trades or businesses deleted text begin required to use a different formula under subdivision 3 or section 290.36, and for those trades or businesses that receive permission to use some other method under section 290.20 or under subdivision 4deleted text end new text begin listed in paragraph (c)new text end , a trade or business required to apportion its net income must apportion its income to this state on the basis of the percentage obtained by taking the sum of: (1) the percent for the sales factor under paragraph (b) of the percentage which the sales made within this state in connection with the trade or business during the tax period are of the total sales wherever made in connection with the trade or business during the tax period; (2) the percent for the property factor under paragraph (b) of the percentage which the total tangible property used by the taxpayer in this state in connection with the trade or business during the tax period is of the total tangible property, wherever located, used by the taxpayer in connection with the trade or business during the tax period; and (3) the percent for the payroll factor under paragraph (b) of the percentage which the taxpayer's total payrolls paid or incurred in this state or paid in respect to labor performed in this state in connection with the trade or business during the tax period are of the taxpayer's total payrolls paid or incurred in connection with the trade or business during the tax period. (b) For purposes of paragraph (a) and subdivision 3, the following percentages apply for the taxable years specified: Taxable years beginning during calendar year Sales factor percent Property factor percent Payroll factorpercent 2007 78 11 11 2008 81 9.5 9.5 2009 84 8 8 2010 87 6.5 6.5 2011 90 5 5 2012 93 3.5 3.5 2013 96 2 2 2014 and later calendar years 100 0 0 new text begin (c) Paragraphs (a) and (b) do not apply to a trade or business that: new text end new text begin (1) is required to use a different formula under subdivision 3 or section 290.36; new text end new text begin (2) received permission to use a different method under section 290.20; or new text end new text begin (3) includes foreign pro rata sales under subdivision 13, but only to the extent that the inclusion is inconsistent with paragraphs (a) and (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.191, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Factor relief for global intangible low-taxed income. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section and section 290.17, subdivision 4, "foreign pro rata sales" means a qualified controlled foreign corporation's total sales factor, regardless of where the sales are made, multiplied by its foreign sales ratio; new text end new text begin (2) "foreign sales ratio" means the amount of global intangible low-taxed income included in a qualified shareholder's net income divided by the net income of the qualified controlled foreign corporation; new text end new text begin (3) "global intangible low-taxed income" has the meaning given in section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended through May 1, 2023; new text end new text begin (4) "qualified controlled foreign corporation" means a controlled foreign corporation, as provided in section 975(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, owned in whole or in part by a qualified shareholder; new text end new text begin (5) "qualified manufacturer" means a qualified shareholder that is: new text end new text begin (i) primarily engaged in the business of manufacturing, which for purposes of this paragraph means the taxpayer's activities are classified under sector 31, 32, or 33 of the North American Industry Classification System; and new text end new text begin (ii) including global intangible low-taxed income in the taxpayer's net income; and new text end new text begin (6) "qualified shareholder" means the shareholder of a controlled foreign corporation that must include any amount of global intangible low-taxed income in the shareholder's gross income under section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (b) A qualified manufacturer's foreign pro rata sales must be included in the manufacturer's sales factor for purposes of determining the denominator of the qualified manufacturer's apportionment percentage under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.21, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Global intangible low-taxed income. Any amounts included in taxable income pursuant to section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code, are dividend income.new text begin This subdivision does not apply to a qualified manufacturer as defined in section 290.191, subdivision 13.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end